Arkansas, session 2025, HB1631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 42, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-42-131. License for foreign exchange students.
For purposes of the issuance of a hunting license or fishing license
under this subchapter, the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission may
categorize a foreign exchange student in the same manner as a nonresident
college student.








*CRH092*
02/27/2025 3:49:35 PM CRH092